Arkansas, session 2025, HB1213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-710(a), concerning definitions related
to student athlete concussion education, is amended to read as follows:
6-18-710. Student athlete concussion education — Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section:,
(1) "Healthcare provider" means an allopathic or osteopathic
physician, neuropsychologist, advanced practice registered nurse, certified
athletic trainer, physician assistant, or physical therapist; and
(2)(A) "Youth "youth athletic activity" means an organized
athletic activity in which the participants, a majority of whom are under
nineteen (19) years of age are:
(A)(i) Engaged in an athletic game or competition against
another team, club, or entity; or
*JMB246*
03-03-2025 13:50:42 JMB246

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/19/25 S3/3/25 HB1213
(B)(ii) In practice or preparation for an organized
athletic game or competition against another team, club, or entity.
(2)(B) “Youth athletic activity” does not include a college or
university activity or an activity that is incidental to a nonathletic
program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-18-710(c), concerning student athlete
concussion education, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) The Department of Health shall develop concussion protocols
substantially similar to those developed and implemented by the Arkansas
Activities Association to protect all youth athletes engaged in youth
athletic activities in Arkansas.
(2) The Department of Health shall provide an updated type of
healthcare provider list to the Arkansas Activities Association based on the
definition under subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-93-402 is amended to read as follows:
17-93-402. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Athlete” means an individual who is participating in
organized athletic or team activities at the interscholastic, intramural,
intercollegiate, or professional level, or sanctioned recreational sports
activities activities of recreation, sport, exercise, or tactical duty;
(2) “Athletic injury or illness” means an injury or illness
sustained by the athlete as a result of participation in those organized
athletic or team activities activities of recreation, sport, exercise, or
tactical duty which require physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of
motion, speed, or stamina, or any comparable injury or illness to an athlete
which prevents the person from participating in activities described in
subdivision (1) of this section;
(3) “Athletic trainer” means a person licensed by the state to
engage in athletic training;
(4) “Athletic training” means the prevention, recognition,
evaluation, treatment, and rehabilitation of an athletic injury or illness
and the organization and administration of exercise, conditioning, and
athletic training programs;
03-03-2025 13:50:42 JMB246

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/19/25 S3/3/25 HB1213
(5) “Clinical setting” means a hospital or outpatient clinic;
(6)(A) “Consultation” means the rendering by a physician of a
professional opinion, an expert opinion, or advice to an athletic trainer.
(B) "Consultation" may be provided through
telecommunication technology;
(7)(A) “Freestanding rehabilitation clinic” means a
rehabilitation clinic that is not located on the campus of a hospital or
healthcare system.
(B) "Freestanding rehabilitation clinic" does not include
a physician’s office;
(8) “Direct supervision” means supervision of the athletic
trainer in a clinical setting freestanding rehabilitation clinic by the
supervising physical therapist or physician who is readily available for
consultation for the care of the athlete and is on the premises;
(7)(9) “Direction” means direction of the athletic trainer in a
nonclinical setting or physician’s office by a physician who is readily
available for consultation for the care of the athlete but not necessarily on
the premises;
(8)(10) “License” means the document issued by the Arkansas
State Board of Athletic Training to a qualified person to practice athletic
training; and
(9) “Sanctioned recreational sports activities” means any
athletic or team activity which requires physical strength, agility,
flexibility, range of motion, speed, or stamina and meets one (1) or more of
the following:
(A) Has officially designated coaches who have the
responsibility for athletic activities of the organization;
(B) Has a regular schedule of practices or workouts which
are supervised by the officially designated coaches;
(C) Is an activity generally recognized as having an
established schedule of competitive events or exhibitions; and
(D) Has a policy requiring documentation of having passed
a preparticipation medical examination conducted by a licensed physician as a
condition for participation for the athletic activities of the organization
(11) "Tactical duty" means activities of law enforcement,
military, or rescue services.
03-03-2025 13:50:42 JMB246

As Engrossed: H2/13/25 H2/19/25 S3/3/25 HB1213

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-93-411 is amended to read as follows:
17-93-411. Direction and supervision.
(a) In a nonclinical setting, an athletic trainer may practice the art
and science of athletic training under the direction of a physician licensed
by the Arkansas State Medical Board.
(b)(1) The athletic trainer may practice athletic training in a
hospital or outpatient clinic under the direct supervision of a physical
therapist and upon the referral of a physician licensed in the State of
Arkansas or of a physician licensed by the board physician’s office under the
direction or consultation of a physician licensed in this state.
(2) However, the physician shall retain moral, ethical, and
legal responsibility for patient care according to their specific medical
license.
(c) The athletic trainer may practice athletic training in a
freestanding rehabilitation clinic under the direct supervision of a physical
therapist and upon the referral of a physician licensed in this state.

/s/Achor

















03-03-2025 13:50:42 JMB246